Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Part 2

Time for Issuance

26-1-201. Issuance without demand.

The clerks of the several courts may issue executions in favor of the successful party on all judgments as soon after the adjournment of the court as practicable within the time prescribed by this code, without any demand of the party.

Code 1858, § 3002; Shan., § 4732; Code 1932, § 8866; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-111; Acts 1985, ch. 131, § 2.

Cross-References. Writs issued by chancery, § 21-1-802.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 12; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 3, 5, 7.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

26-1-202. Time of issuance from Supreme Court.

Each clerk of the supreme court is authorized and directed to issue execution and writ of possession upon any final judgment or decree of the supreme court for such clerk's division at any time after the expiration of the ten (10) days allowed for the filing of petition to rehear after the final judgment or decree is rendered by the court.

Acts 1903, ch. 58, § 1; 1907, ch. 82, § 6; Shan., § 4733a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8867; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 8867; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-112.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 679.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 51; 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Court of Appeals (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

26-1-203. Time of issuance from courts of record.

The clerks of the various courts of record may issue writs of possession and execution in any case at any time after thirty (30) days after judgment.

Code 1858, § 3005; Acts 1868-1869, ch. 47, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 62, § 1; Shan., § 4734; mod. Code 1932, § 8868; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-113; Acts 1985, ch. 131, § 3.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 301, 309.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

26-1-204, 26-1-205. [Reserved.]

After the adjournment of the court, and before the expiration of the time prescribed by §§ 26-1-202 — 26-1-206, the clerk shall issue execution without delay, upon affidavit made and filed in that clerk's office, that the defendant is about fraudulently to dispose of, conceal, or remove the defendant's property, to the endangering of plaintiff's debt.

Upon the rendition of judgment or decree, execution may be issued, by leave of the court, before the adjournment thereof, the plaintiff or the plaintiff's agent or attorney of the plaintiff, showing sufficient cause by affidavit.

In like manner, general sessions courts may, immediately after judgment and before the expiration of the time allowed by law for the stay of execution, issue execution on good cause shown by affidavit; and affidavit by the plaintiff, or the plaintiff's agent or attorney of the plaintiff, as prescribed in subsection (a), shall be good cause within the meaning of this subsection (c).

The issuance of execution under subsections (b) and (c), shall not deprive the defendant of any right the defendant would otherwise have had.

Code 1858, §§ 3009-3012 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 17, § 10); Shan., §§ 4737-4740; Code 1932, §§ 8871-8874; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 26-116 — 26-119.

Compiler's Notes. Sections 26-1-204 and 26-1-205, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 131, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 5; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, §§ 32, 33.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgment in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, III. Security and Stay Pending Appeal (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 23.

26-1-207. Issuance on demand.

In all other cases, the clerk shall issue to the plaintiff, the plaintiff's agent or attorney, on demand, an execution on any judgment or decree to which the plaintiff is entitled. Any clerk, who fails or refuses to issue execution as prescribed in this section, forfeits five hundred dollars ($500), to be recovered by action, and is liable to the party aggrieved in damages, and commits a Class C misdemeanor, for which, upon conviction, such clerk shall be removed from office.

Code 1858, §§ 3013, 3014 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 3, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 4741, 4742; mod. Code 1932, §§ 8875, 8876; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-120; Acts 1989, ch. 519, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 617.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Execution, §§ 5, 7; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mandamus, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Unauthorized practice of law by licensed collection agencies, OAG 86-159, 1985 Tenn. AG LEXIS 53 (9/10/86) .